Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 74 IDAHO SOLID WASTE FACILITIES ACT
§ 39-7408D. Duties of the director relative to siting applications.

Upon receipt of a complete siting license application, the director or an authorized representative of the director shall:

Notify the permanent panel members, the city and/or county in which the commercial solid waste facility is located or proposed to be located, the director of the department of fish and game, the director of the Idaho state police, and other state agencies as deemed appropriate by the director.

Publish a notice that the application has been received, as provided in section 60-109, Idaho Code, in a newspaper having major circulation in the county and the immediate vicinity of the proposed commercial solid waste facility. The notice shall contain a map indicating the location of the proposed commercial solid waste facility, a description of the proposed action and the location where the application may be reviewed. The notice shall describe the procedure by which the siting license may be granted.

Upon notification by the director, the chairman shall immediately notify the representatives of the state to the panel and the public members. The chairman shall also notify the applicable county and city for their appointment of members as provided in subsection (2) of section 39-7408B, Idaho Code. Within thirty (30) days after the notification, the board of commissioners of the county and the city council shall select the members to serve on the panel. The panel shall be created at that time and notification of the creation of the panel shall be made to the chairman.

Within thirty (30) days after appointment of panel members, the panel shall meet to review and establish a timetable for the consideration of the draft site license.

The panel shall:

Set a date and arrange for publication of notice of a public hearing in a newspaper having major circulation in the vicinity of the proposed site, at its first meeting. The public notice shall:

Contain a map indicating the location of the proposed commercial solid waste facility, a description of the proposed action, and the location where the application for a siting license may be reviewed and where copies may be obtained;

Identify the time, place and location for the public hearing held to receive public comment and input on the application for a siting license;

Publish the notice not less than thirty (30) days before the date of the public hearing and the notice shall be, at a minimum, a twenty (20) days’ notice as provided in section 60-109, Idaho Code.

Comment and input on the proposed commercial solid waste facility may be presented orally or in writing at the public hearing, and shall continue to be accepted in writing by the panel for thirty (30) days after the public hearing date. The public hearing shall be held in the same county as the proposed site. If the proposed site is adjacent to a city or populated area in a neighboring county, it is recommended that public hearings also be held in the neighboring county.

The panel shall consider, but not be limited to, the following:

The risk of the spread of disease or impact upon public health from improper treatment, storage, or incineration methods;

The impact on local units of government where the proposed commercial solid waste facility is to be located in terms of health, safety, cost and consistency with local planning and existing development. The panel shall also consider city and county ordinances, permits or other requirements and their potential relationship to the proposed commercial solid waste facility;

The nature of the probable environmental and public health impact;

The financial capability of the applicant to construct, operate and close the commercial solid waste facility.

The panel shall consider the concerns and objections submitted by the public. The panel shall facilitate efforts to provide that the concerns and objections are mitigated by proposing additional conditions regarding the construction of the commercial solid waste facility. The panel may propose conditions which integrate the provisions of the city or county ordinances, permits or requirements.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days after creation, the panel shall recommend to the director that the license be issued, issued with conditions, or rejected. The director shall act on a license application within sixty (60) days after receipt of the panel’s recommendation. If the panel recommends conditions, a clear statement of the need for a condition must be submitted to the director. If the panel recommends rejection, a clear statement of the reasons for the denial must be submitted to the director.

The director shall issue, issue with conditions or reject a siting license only as recommended by the siting panel. The director may reconvene a siting panel and request reconsideration of its original recommendation prior to the director’s final action.

An applicant or any person aggrieved by a decision of the director pursuant to this chapter may within sixty (60) days of the director’s decision, and, after all remedies have been exhausted under the provisions of this chapter, seek judicial review under the procedures provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and may also seek de novo judicial review.

§ 39-7409. Standards for design.

Applicability. These standards apply to new MSWLF units and lateral expansions of existing facilities as provided in 40 CFR 258.40.

Liner designs. All owners or operators of MSWLF units shall use one (1) of the following designs:

Composite liner design. A liner as provided under 40 CFR 258.40(b) and shall include a leachate collection system as provided under 40 CFR 258.40(a)(2); or

Alternate liner design. A site-specific design based upon environmental performance, as allowed under 40 CFR 258.40(a)(1) which will ensure that the concentration values listed in table 1, 40 CFR 258.40, or as amended, will not be exceeded in the uppermost aquifer at the relevant point of compliance. This design shall demonstrate consideration of site specific factors as provided in 40 CFR 258.40(c) and shall include a leachate collection system as provided under 40 CFR 258.40(a)(2); or

Arid design. A site-specific design based upon environmental performance, as allowed under 40 CFR 258.40(a)(1) which will ensure that the concentration values listed in table 1, 40 CFR 258.40, or as amended, will not be exceeded in the uppermost aquifer at the relevant point of compliance. This design shall use both field collected data and predictions that maximize contaminant migration for demonstrating no potential for migration. This design will apply to locations having less than twenty-five (25) inches of precipitation annually, net evaporative losses greater than thirty (30) inches annually, and holding capacity in native soils greater than annual absorbance; and

solid waste is deposited no less than fifty (50) feet above the seasonal high level of ground water in the uppermost aquifer;

the geologic formation beneath the site and above the uppermost aquifer must have capillary capacities greater than the projected maximum volume of leachate generated during the active life of the MSWLF unit; and

“no potential for migration” is demonstrated when the geologic formation beneath the site and above the uppermost aquifer has sufficient hydrogeological characteristics and holding capacity adequate to contain all hazardous constituents generated during the active life, closure and post-closure care periods.

Point of compliance. For each MSWLF unit, the relevant point of compliance shall be set by a qualified professional by criteria contained in 40 CFR 258.40(d)(1) through (d)(8), inclusive, subject to approval by the director.

Leachate discharge shall comply with permitted discharge requirements under the federal clean water act (PL 95-217) and federal storm water discharge regulations (40 CFR part 122).

§ 39-7410. Ground water monitoring design.

Applicability. These requirements apply to MSWLF units except:

When the MSWLF unit meets the conditions for exemption in 40 CFR 258.1(f); provided however, that the director may, at his discretion, require monitoring of a MSWLF unit which meets the conditions for exemption in 40 CFR 258.1(f), if necessary to protect ground water resources. If the director does require ground water monitoring of such MSWLF unit, a method other than the ground water monitoring wells required in this section and in 40 CFR 258.51 through 258.55 may be used to detect a release of contamination from the unit; or

When suspended upon demonstration in accordance with 40 CFR 258.50 that there is no potential for migration of hazardous constituents from the MSWLF unit to the uppermost aquifer during the active life of the unit and the post-closure care periods when certified by a qualified professional and approved by the director.

Ground water monitoring program. All monitoring programs shall be conducted in a manner consistent with the guidance of relevant portions of appendix F per the “Federal Register” of October 9, 1991. The schedule for compliance as provided by 40 CFR 258.50 shall apply unless an alternative schedule is approved by the director.

A ground water monitoring system must be installed that consists of a sufficient number of wells, installed at appropriate locations and depths, to conform with the requirements of 40 CFR 258.51(a) and (d).

A multiunit ground water monitoring system may be constructed instead of separate ground water monitoring systems for each MSWLF unit as provided in 40 CFR 258.51(b).

Monitoring wells must be cased in a manner that maintains the integrity of the monitoring well bore hole as provided in 40 CFR 258.51(c). Wells must be constructed in such a manner as to prevent contamination of the samples, the sampled strata, and between aquifers and water bearing strata, and in accordance with Idaho department of water resources, well construction standards and the monitoring well standards of the national ground water association.

Point of compliance. For each MSWLF unit, the relevant point of compliance shall be set as a function of site and monitoring program design subject to the approval of the director. The relevant point of compliance for purposes of MSWLF unit design, well location and corrective action shall be:

Located within the flow pathway(s) predicted from the results of the hydrogeologic investigation;

No more than one hundred fifty (150) meters downgradient from the waste management unit boundary;

On contiguous property owned, or otherwise subject to possessory rights by the MSWLF owner;

Shall be identified by the qualified professional on all reports and documents pertaining to analysis of ground water protection measures; and

Determined in consideration of factors provided in 40 CFR 258.40(d).

Ground water characterization, sampling and analysis requirements.

The ground water monitoring system must include sampling and analysis procedures consistent with 40 CFR 258.53.

Monitoring wells shall be tested for the constituents listed in 40 CFR 258, appendix I, plus temperature, unless otherwise authorized by the director as provided in 40 CFR 258.54.

Background values will be based on an independent sample from each well sampled at three (3) month intervals in a one (1) year period.

Detection monitoring program.

Detection monitoring is required throughout the active life and post-closure care period at MSWLF units as provided in 40 CFR 258.54 at all ground water monitoring wells as defined in 40 CFR 258.51(a)(1) and (a)(2) for constituents listed in 40 CFR 258, appendix I.

Each well shall be monitored on a semiannual basis after background characterization. Alternative constituents and sampling frequency may be approved by the director based upon considerations as defined in 40 CFR 258.54(a)(2) and (b). Requests for alternative constituents or frequency shall be based on a report certified by a qualified professional.

Each ground water sample event must include a determination of the ground water surface elevation, flow direction and rate.

§ 39-7411. Design review procedure.

Design of a MSWLF unit shall not be reviewed until site certification has been obtained. After obtaining site certification, an applicant shall produce design plans and specifications which comply with the design standards set forth in sections 39-7409 and 39-7410, Idaho Code. The responsibility for complying with said standards shall rest solely with the applicant of the site.

An applicant may notify the director of its intent to initiate a MSWLF site design and meet with the director to discuss standards, schedule, design process to be used and particular concerns of the director.

The applicant shall conduct aerial and cadastral surveys, relevant studies, and prepare a hydrogeologic report which will satisfy standards and other provisions in accordance with this chapter and applicable state regulations. Specific climatic data and verification of location restrictions shall be included.

The applicant shall submit findings and a tentative design plan, including preliminary schematic design of environmental monitoring systems to the director as a result of the preliminary design investigation. The submittal initiates a twenty-eight (28) day period for department review and comment. Concurrent with the submittal to the director, the applicant shall publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation, as determined by the criteria in section 31-819, Idaho Code, in the county wherein the MSWLF would be located notifying the public that a preliminary design plan has been submitted to the director and is available for public review. The date of publication initiates a twenty-eight (28) day period for department review and public comment. Written public comments concerning the proposed design plan shall be compiled by the director. The compiled public comments received by the director and those generated by the director shall be transmitted to the owner, and the applicant if other than the owner, no more than thirty-five (35) days after the date of publication of the notice or seven (7) days after the end of the public comment period, whichever is later.

When a response is received from the director, the applicant may submit the facility design, ground water monitoring program, and specifications, in a final design report which addresses standards established by this chapter, applicable federal regulations and other relevant provisions of state law. Said submittal shall include a site-specific analysis of hydrogeologic conditions, location restrictions and other factors relevant to long-term site integrity, and shall address comments from the public and the director related to objective standards in the final design report. Said submittal shall be prepared by a qualified professional in a manner consistent with sound professional practices. The submittal of this final design report initiates a fifty-six (56) day period for the director’s review.

Concurrent with submittal to the director, the applicant shall release the final design report, including all supporting reports, plans and documentation, to the extent practicable, for public comment by placing it for inspection at every public library within the county where the proposed MSWLF would be located. Copies of the submittal shall be made available for possession, at the cost of duplication, at a public location in the county seat of the county where the proposed MSWLF unit would be located. The applicant shall publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation, as determined by the criteria in section 31-819, Idaho Code, in the county wherein the MSWLF would be located notifying the public that a final design report has been submitted to the director and is available for public review. Public comments shall be submitted, in writing, to the director within twenty-eight (28) days of the date of publication.
(7) No more than fifty-six (56) days after publication of notice of submittal, or twenty-eight (28) days after the close of an advertised public comment period, whichever is later, the director shall enter a decision either approving or disapproving the final design. The decision shall be in writing and shall make one (1) of the following findings:

No more than fifty-six (56) days after publication of notice of submittal, or twenty-eight (28) days after the close of an advertised public comment period, whichever is later, the director shall enter a decision either approving or disapproving the final design. The decision shall be in writing and shall make one (1) of the following findings:

Based upon the information submitted, design complies with applicable standards.

Based upon the information submitted, the design does not comply with applicable standards, setting forth with specificity the material standards not met or insufficiently documented.

Failure to comport with professional standards.

Upon entering a decision of disapproval, an automatic twenty-one (21) day stay of proceedings shall occur unless waived by the applicant. During the twenty-one (21) day stay, the director and the applicant may meet and confer to attempt to reconcile differences. At any point during that twenty-one (21) day period the director and applicant can reach an accord and approval can be granted, with construction authorized at that point. The applicant can tender a written waiver of this twenty-one (21) day reconciliation period which would initiate the requirement provided for in subsection (9) of this section. At any time in the review process or post-decision reconciliation process the applicant and director may mutually agree to extend the timeframes contained herein and may resort to mediation, arbitration, or binding arbitration to resolve differences as they mutually see fit.

If differences are not reconciled in the period set forth in subsection (8) of this section, the director shall notify the owner that the design remains disapproved. Said notice of disapproval shall incorporate the rationale for disapproval contained in the original decision of disapproval, deleting any issues resolved in the post-decision reconciliation period.

Following final action by the director the applicant may file a petition with the district court, with concurrent notice to the director, in the county where the proposed MSWLF would be located for expedited appellate review of the director’s decision. The petition shall set forth the specific basis for the appeal and shall identify the legal and factual basis for contesting the disapproval by the director. The director shall submit a copy of the entire record upon which its disapproval has been based no more than fourteen (14) days after the date the applicant’s petition for review has been filed. Only information which has been available during the design review process may be used in the judicial review process.

All issues claimed as a basis of appeal by the applicant shall be addressed in a memorandum filed with the petition appealing disapproval by the director. The director shall submit a reply memorandum no later than fourteen (14) days after the applicant’s petition for review has been filed.

Upon the record, the applicable law, the memoranda of the respective parties, and such independent technical assistance as the court may find it necessary and appropriate to retain, the court shall evaluate the applicant’s petition and the decision by the director and shall render a decision no more than twenty-one (21) days after the completed record, and accompanying memorandum, if one is filed, are submitted to the court by the director. The court shall sustain the director’s disapproval action if it affirmatively finds that the record contains substantial evidence that the design does not comply with standards as specified pursuant to section 39-7412(7)(b) or (c), Idaho Code. If the court finds the disapproval is not supported by substantial evidence in the record, it shall reverse the director’s action and remand the matter to the director with appropriate instructions.
(13) The procedure set forth in subsections (10) through (12) of this section are effective until January 1, 1994. On and after January 1, 1994, the applicant is entitled to judicial review pursuant to chapter 67, title 52 [chapter 52, title 67], Idaho Code. Upon waiver or expiration of the twenty-one (21) day reconciliation period, the director and the applicant shall stipulate to accelerated judicial review pursuant to court approval where the ordinary review period provided in chapter 67, title 52 [chapter 52, title 67], Idaho Code, may reasonably result in substantial increased costs to the applicant, potential violations of federal or state environmental laws or threats to the public health and environment.

Failure of the director to respond to an applicant’s request for approval in the manner provided herein shall constitute approval of the request. Construction shall not be initiated on a MSWLF unit until approval has been granted, except that construction prior to approval may be initiated prior to July 1, 1993, for a MSWLF unit which meets the design standard of section 39-7409(2)(a), Idaho Code. The applicant shall publish notice of approval in a newspaper of general circulation when affirmative or defacto [
de facto
] approval is given.

§ 39-7412. Standards for operation.

Owners or operators of all MSWLF units shall:

Implement a program for detecting and preventing disposal of regulated hazardous wastes as provided in 40 CFR 258.20;

Provide for daily cover as provided in 40 CFR 258.21. Alternative materials or cover frequency other than daily cover may be used only as specified by the MSWLF plan of operation;

Provide disease vector control as provided in 40 CFR 258.22;

Implement a program of routine methane monitoring and control as provided in 40 CFR 258.23;

Ensure that MSWLF units do not violate any ambient air quality standard or emission standard from any emission of landfill gases, combustion or any other emission associated with a MSWLF unit as provided in 40 CFR 258.24;

Provide and control access as provided in 40 CFR 258.25;

Design, construct and maintain a run-on/run-off control system as provided in 40 CFR 258.26 to:

Prevent all the run-on of surface waters and other liquids resulting from a maximum flow of a twenty-five (25) year storm, or snowmelt into the active portion of the MSWLF unit;

Control the collection of the run-off of surface waters and other liquids resulting from a twenty-four (24) hour, twenty-five (25) year storm, or snowmelt, whichever is greater, from the active portion and the closed portions of a MSWLF unit; and

Prevent the discharge of pollutants into waters of the United States and the state of Idaho as defined in 40 CFR 258.27;

Prohibit the disposal of noncontainerized liquids or sludges containing free liquids in MSWLF units except as provided in 40 CFR 258.28;

Establish an operating and recordkeeping procedure as provided in 40 CFR 258.29; and

Comply with operating procedures established by the board for implementation by the districts which are intended to assure operations which protect the public health and maintain the integrity of the landfill design.

MSWLF units that dispose of greater than twenty (20) tons per day of municipal solid waste based on an annual average shall:

Monitor daily climatic conditions. Monitoring shall include precipitation including snow, evaporation, evaporative water temperature, air temperature, wind speed and direction; and

Weigh all incoming waste or provide an equivalent method of measuring waste tonnage capable of estimating total annual solid waste tonnage.

§ 39-7413. Operations plan review.

Prior to operation of a MSWLF unit, an operations plan shall be submitted to the health district with jurisdiction. It shall be the responsibility of each applicant of a MSWLF unit to certify to the health district that the provisions of section 39-7412, Idaho Code, have been complied with through development of an operating plan. No solid waste disposal facility shall accept waste without a current operating certificate from the health district with jurisdiction.

The health district shall review operational plans in the same manner as the director reviews requests for site certification pursuant to section 39-7408, Idaho Code. An applicant shall provide information in the operations plan in sufficient detail to show compliance with the provisions of section 39-7412, Idaho Code, and required procedures adopted pursuant thereto. The same standards of review shall apply to an operations plan as apply to the site certification process. The health district shall accept certification by a qualified professional that standards of operation have been met upon presentation of the professional’s certification of compliance and presentation of a written explanation of operational practices which will be undertaken to meet standards established in section 39-7412, Idaho Code.

If an operations plan provides for alternative operating criteria requiring approval by the director as provided in 40 CFR 258, the health district shall make a decision recommending approval or disapproval. Such plan shall be submitted by the health district to the director for his review. The submittal shall be accompanied by findings of fact and the recommendation from the health district.

The director shall review the recommendation submitted by the health districts and shall make a decision to approve or disapprove. The director shall review recommendations for approval using the same standards of review provided in section 39-7408(2)(e), Idaho Code.

§ 39-7414. Assessment monitoring and corrective action.

Applicability. These standards apply whenever a statistically significant increase over background has been detected for one (1) or more constituents listed in 40 CFR 258, appendix I or an alternative list approved in accordance with 40 CFR 258.54(a)(2).

Assessment monitoring programs shall be performed in accordance with 40 CFR 258.55.

Assessment of corrective measures shall be performed in accordance with 40 CFR 258.56.

Selection of remedy shall be performed in accordance with 40 CFR 258.57.

Implementation of corrective action program shall be performed in accordance with 40 CFR 258.58.

§ 39-7415. Standards for closure.

Applicability. These standards apply to all MSWLF units that receive wastes on or after October 9, 1993, except as provided by 40 CFR 258. MSWLF units that accept waste after October 9, 1991, but cease to accept waste prior to October 9, 1993, shall at a minimum comply with subsections (2)(a) and (3) of this section in addition to the “sanitary landfill closure guidance” criteria as adopted by the health district.

Cover designs. Owners or operators of MSWLF units shall install one (1) of the following final cover systems:

A cover as provided under 40 CFR 258.60(a); or

The cover material must be fine-grained with intrinsic permeability no greater than 1 X 10-3 cm/sec and a minimum thickness of twenty-four (24) inches; and

Have capillary holding capacity greater than the projected maximum accumulated volume of water as determined by utilization of accepted water balance methodology based on local or regional twenty-five (25) year climatic records;

Annual precipitation is less than twenty-five (25) inches with net evaporative losses greater than thirty (30) inches annually;

The top six (6) inches of the cover shall be capable of sustaining shallow rooted native plant growth; and

This design shall demonstrate consideration of site specific factors as provided in 40 CFR 258.60(b); or

As provided in 40 CFR 258.60(b).

The final grade of slopes shall be greater than two percent (2%) unless otherwise supported by the post closure plan and uses approved by the health district, and the grade of side slopes not more than thirty-three percent (33%).

Closure plan preparation, placement in operating record, notice of intent to close, time requirements for commencement and completion of closure activities, certification, deed notation and removal of deed notation shall be conducted as provided in 40 CFR 258.60(c) through (j), inclusive. The deed notation and removal of deed notation shall comply with the uniform environmental covenants act, chapter 30, title 55, Idaho Code.

§ 39-7416. Standards for post closure care.

Applicability. Post closure maintenance standards apply to all MSWLF units that receive wastes on or after October 9, 1993, except as provided by 40 CFR 258.1.

Post closure care shall be conducted as provided under 40 CFR 258.61.

§ 39-7417. Financial assurance for closure, post closure care and corrective action.

Applicability. These requirements shall apply to new MSWLF units, existing MSWLF units and lateral expansions except as exempted in 40 CFR 258.1(d) and 258.70(a).

The requirements of this section are effective April 9, 1995, except for MSWLF units meeting the conditions of 40 CFR 258.1(f)(1), in which case the effective date is October 9, 1995, or at such later date upon subsequent amendment of 40 CFR 258.70 through 258.74.

All MSWLF units shall be underwritten by financial assurance provisions as provided by the following:

Closure as provided in 40 CFR 258.71;

Post closure care as provided in 40 CFR 258.72; and

Corrective action as provided in 40 CFR 258.73.

The financial assurance mechanisms provided for MSWLF units shall include any mechanism or a combination of mechanisms meeting the criteria of 40 CFR 258.74.

Counties may use available borrowing capability through registered warrants for a prearranged amount and preapproved by a lending institution as a financial mechanism to assure assessment monitoring and corrective action needs.

Subdivisions of the state may use any method provided by law to meet the requirements of this section.

MSWLF units owned or operated by subdivisions of the state that qualify under 40 CFR 258.74(f) may include any mechanism allowed to them upon adoption and publication.

Financial assurance funds for MSWLF units not located on federal or state lands shall be deposited in a county trust fund in the county in which the MSWLF unit is located. The county shall act as the trustee for the trust funds, and as named coprincipal for surety bonds, letters of credit, and insurance. As trustee, the county may require an independent audit of the adequacy of the financial assurance but shall not become liable for financial assurance except in the case of default as otherwise defined by federal and state law.

§ 39-7418. Modifications to sites approved under this chapter.

The following classes of modifications to approved sites shall require that an owner or operator amend the approved design or ground water monitoring program:

Lateral expansion outside the approved waste management unit boundary design;

Unpredictable change affecting any environmental monitoring program;

Change of liner design; or

A modification of the design or operation due to initiation of corrective action and remediation.

The scope of new investigations and plan amendment shall be defined by the owner, director and health district before any modification to the decision is begun. Only those stages of the applicable approval process affected by the request for modification shall be required.

§ 39-7419. Inspections.

All MSWLF units shall be subject to routine inspection by the county, director and health district in accordance with relevant provisions of the Idaho Code.

At intervals of not less than three (3) years, nor more than five (5) years, the owner, county, director and health district shall jointly conduct a comprehensive review of the MSWLF unit for provisions contained in this chapter, technical guidance, other provisions, and the plan for design and operation, as amended. A record of the review shall be placed in the operating record of the MSWLF unit which shall be maintained by the owner and the health district with jurisdiction. Operating procedures shall be recertified at intervals of no more than three (3) years.

§ 39-7420. Violations and enforcement.

Failure to comply with the requirements established in this chapter, requirements of rules established pursuant to this chapter, and reasonable conditions of approval granted pursuant to this chapter shall be unlawful. Particularly with respect to siting and operation of a municipal solid waste landfill to satisfy the requirements of chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code, enforcement should focus upon remediation of deficiencies, rather than punishment. Penalties should be imposed where practices show disregard for protection of human health, safety and the environment.

Each public agency with responsibility for enforcement of requirements established in this chapter may inspect, monitor and employ such methods of enforcement as they may be empowered to use by statute or local ordinance.

The director may apply the provisions of section 39-108, Idaho Code, to insure compliance.

The respective health districts or the several counties may employ the use of negotiated compliance agreements in addition to civil legal remedies and misdemeanor criminal penalties otherwise authorized in order to obtain compliance with requirements established herein.

Where more than one (1) public entity undertakes enforcement efforts to obtain compliance with the provisions of this chapter, enforcement efforts should be coordinated to the greatest extent possible to minimize conflict among requirements and costs of compliance.

A private right of action in behalf of any person who has been injured or damaged by any approval authorized in this chapter or violation of the terms of any approval or regulation authorized in this chapter may be maintained in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and/or the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, as applicable.

If a district fails to carry out responsibilities established in this chapter, the director may assume the authority otherwise to be implemented by a district.